Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1307
Bonds; issuance; sinking fund.

For carrying out the purposes and powers set forth in sections 74-1302, 74-1303, and 74-1305, including paying the cost thereof, the district may: (1) Borrow money and issue its negotiable general obligation bonds upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors may determine and without a vote of the electors; (2) issue warrants to contractors and others furnishing services or materials or in satisfaction of other obligations created under sections 74-1302, 74-1303, and 74-1305, such warrants to be issued in such amounts and on such terms and conditions as the board shall determine, and to be redeemed and paid upon the sale of bonds or receipt of other funds available for such purpose; and (3) establish a sinking fund for the payment of such bonds as may be issued under this section.

Laws 1971, LB 919, § 7;

Laws 1985, LB 81, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 161, § 12.